Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201546-117
Elections; return and canvass of vote.

(1) Elections under the Irrigation District Act, together with the ballots cast thereat, shall be certified by the boards of election for the precincts to the board of directors of the irrigation district within three days after the election or the deadline for casting ballots by mail.

(2) No lists, tally paper, or certificate returned from any election shall be set aside or rejected for want of form if it can be satisfactorily understood. The board of directors must meet at its usual place of meeting on the first Monday after each election and canvass the returns. If at the time of meeting the returns from each precinct in the district in which the polls were opened or ballots were mailed have been received, the board of directors must then and there proceed to canvass the returns; but if all the returns have not been received the canvass must be postponed from day to day until all the returns have been received or until six postponements have been had. The canvass must be made in public and by opening the returns and estimating the vote of the district for each person voted for and declaring the result thereof.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 7, p. 275;

R.S.1913, § 3463;

C.S.1922, § 2863;

C.S.1929, § 46-107;

R.S.1943, § 46-117;

Laws 2015, LB561, § 8.
January 1, 2016